nb: Bryterstammkompatibilitet: Alps; Buckling spring; Cherry MX; Gateron Optical; Hall-effekt; Kailh BOX; Kailh Choc (lavprofil); Kailh Sun; Kailh X-switch; Logitech GL (lavprofil); Membrankuppel; Outemu; Razer; Romer-G; Topre; Annet
ru: Совместимость со стержнем переключателя: Alps; Buckling spring; Cherry MX; Gateron оптический; Эффект Холла; Kailh BOX; Kailh Choc (низкопрофильный); Kailh Sun; Kailh X-switch; Logitech GL (низкопрофильный); Мембранный купольный; Outemu; Razer; Romer-G; Topre; Другой
fi: Kytkimen varren yhteensopivuus: Alps; Buckling spring; Cherry MX; Gateron Optical; Hall-ilmiö; Kailh BOX; Kailh Choc (matalaprofiili); Kailh Sun; Kailh X-switch; Logitech GL (matalaprofiili); Kalvokupukytkin; Outemu; Razer; Romer-G; Topre; Muu
zh-TW: 開關軸相容性: Alps; 屈曲彈簧; Cherry MX; Gateron光軸; 霍爾效應; Kailh BOX; Kailh Choc (矮軸); Kailh Sun; Kailh X開關; Logitech GL (矮軸); 薄膜圓頂; Outemu; Razer; Romer-G; Topre; 其他
de: Schalterschaft-Kompatibilität: Alps; Knickfeder; Cherry MX; Gateron Optical; Hall-Effekt; Kailh BOX; Kailh Choc (niedrigprofil); Kailh Sun; Kailh X-Schalter; Logitech GL (niedrigprofil); Membran-Kuppel; Outemu; Razer; Romer-G; Topre; Sonstiges
el: Συμβατότητα στελέχους διακόπτη: Alps; Buckling spring; Cherry MX; Gateron Optical; Hall effect; Kailh BOX; Kailh Choc (χαμηλού προφίλ); Kailh Sun; Kailh X-switch; Logitech GL (χαμηλού προφίλ); Μεμβράνης θόλου; Outemu; Razer; Romer-G; Topre; Άλλο
sv: Omkopplarstamskompatibilitet: Alps; Buckling spring; Cherry MX; Gateron Optical; Hall-effekt; Kailh BOX; Kailh Choc (lågprofil); Kailh Sun; Kailh X-switch; Logitech GL (lågprofil); Membrandome; Outemu; Razer; Romer-G; Topre; Övrigt
ja: スイッチステムの互換性: Alps; バックリングスプリング; Cherry MX; Gateron オプティカル; ホール効果; Kailh BOX; Kailh Choc (ロープロファイル); Kailh Sun; Kailh X-switch; Logitech GL (ロープロファイル); メンブレンドーム; Outemu; Razer; Romer-G; Topre; その他
da: Kontaktstammekompatibilitet: Alps; Buckling spring; Cherry MX; Gateron Optical; Hall-effekt; Kailh BOX; Kailh Choc (lav profil); Kailh Sun; Kailh X-switch; Logitech GL (lav profil); Membran kuppel; Outemu; Razer; Romer-G; Topre; Andet
hr-HR: Kompatibilnost stabljike prekidača: Alps; Izvijajuća opruga; Cherry MX; Gateron optički; Hallov efekt; Kailh BOX; Kailh Choc (niski profil); Kailh Sun; Kailh X-prekidač; Logitech GL (niski profil); Membranska kupola; Outemu; Razer; Romer-G; Topre; Ostalo
it: Compatibilità dello stelo dell'interruttore: Alps; Buckling spring; Cherry MX; Gateron ottico; Effetto Hall; Kailh BOX; Kailh Choc (basso profilo); Kailh Sun; Kailh X-switch; Logitech GL (basso profilo); Membrana a cupola; Outemu; Razer; Romer-G; Topre; Altro
tr: Anahtar sap uyumluluğu: Alps; Burkulan yay; Cherry MX; Gateron optik; Hall etkisi; Kailh BOX; Kailh Choc (düşük profil); Kailh Sun; Kailh X-switch; Logitech GL (düşük profil); Membran kubbe; Outemu; Razer; Romer-G; Topre; Diğer
ko: 스위치 스템 호환성: 알프스; 버클링 스프링; 체리 MX; 게이트론 옵티컬; 홀 이펙트; 카일 박스; 카일 초크 (로우 프로파일); 카일 썬; 카일 X-스위치; 로지텍 GL (로우 프로파일); 멤브레인 돔; 아웃이뮤; 레이저; 로머-G; 토프레; 기타
pt-PT: Compatibilidade com haste de switch: Alps; Mola de encurvamento; Cherry MX; Gateron Optical; Efeito Hall; Kailh BOX; Kailh Choc (perfil baixo); Kailh Sun; Kailh X-switch; Logitech GL (perfil baixo); Cúpula de membrana; Outemu; Razer; Romer-G; Topre; Outro
hu: Kapcsolószár kompatibilitása: Alps; Rugós; Cherry MX; Gateron Optikai; Hall-effektus; Kailh BOX; Kailh Choc (alacsony profilú); Kailh Sun; Kailh X-switch; Logitech GL (alacsony profilú); Membrán kupola; Outemu; Razer; Romer-G; Topre; Egyéb
cs: Kompatibilita dříku spínače: Alps; Buckling spring; Cherry MX; Gateron optický; Hallův jev; Kailh BOX; Kailh Choc (nízký profil); Kailh Sun; Kailh X-switch; Logitech GL (nízký profil); Membránová kopule; Outemu; Razer; Romer-G; Topre; Jiné
en: Switch stem compatibility: Alps; Buckling spring; Cherry MX; Gateron Optical; Hall effect; Kailh BOX; Kailh Choc (low-profile); Kailh Sun; Kailh X-switch; Logitech GL (low-profile); Membrane dome; Outemu; Razer; Romer-G; Topre; Other
pt-BR: Compatibilidade com haste de switch: Alps; Mola de flambagem; Cherry MX; Gateron Óptico; Efeito Hall; Kailh BOX; Kailh Choc (perfil baixo); Kailh Sun; Kailh X-switch; Logitech GL (perfil baixo); Domo de membrana; Outemu; Razer; Romer-G; Topre; Outro
bg-BG: Съвместимост със „стъблото“ на комутатора: Alps; Buckling spring; Cherry MX; Gateron оптичен; Ефект на Хол; Kailh BOX; Kailh Choc (нисък профил); Kailh Sun; Kailh X-switch; Logitech GL (нисък профил); Мембранен купол; Outemu; Razer; Romer-G; Topre; Други
fr: Compatibilité des tiges de commutation: Alps; Ressort à flambage; Cherry MX; Gateron Optical; Effet Hall; Kailh BOX; Kailh Choc (profil bas); Kailh Sun; Kailh X-switch; Logitech GL (profil bas); Dôme à membrane; Outemu; Razer; Romer-G; Topre; Autre
ro-RO: Compatibilitate cu tija comutatoruluih: Alps; Arc de flambaj; Cherry MX; Gateron optic; Efect Hall; Kailh BOX; Kailh Choc (profil jos); Kailh Sun; Kailh X-switch; Logitech GL (profil jos); Membrană cu dom; Outemu; Razer; Romer-G; Topre; Altele
pl: Kompatybilność z trzpieniem przełącznika: Alps; Buckling spring; Cherry MX; Gateron Optical; Hall effect; Kailh BOX; Kailh Choc (niski profil); Kailh Sun; Kailh X-switch; Logitech GL (niski profil); Membranowy kopułkowy; Outemu; Razer; Romer-G; Topre; Inne
zh-CN: 开关轴兼容性: Alps; 屈曲弹簧; Cherry MX; 佳达隆光轴; 霍尔效应; 凯华 BOX; 凯华 Choc（矮轴）; 凯华 Sun; 凯华 X 轴; 罗技 GL（矮轴）; 薄膜圆顶; 高特; 雷蛇; Romer-G; Topre; 其他
th: ความเข้ากันได้ของก้านสวิตช์: Alps; Buckling spring; Cherry MX; Gateron Optical; Hall effect; Kailh BOX; Kailh Choc (แบบเตี้ย); Kailh Sun; Kailh X-switch; Logitech GL (แบบเตี้ย); เมมเบรนโดม; Outemu; Razer; Romer-G; Topre; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Združljivost s stebli stikal: Alps; Ukrivljena vzmet; Cherry MX; Gateron Optical; Hall efekt; Kailh BOX; Kailh Choc (nizek profil); Kailh Sun; Kailh X-switch; Logitech GL (nizek profil); Membranska kupola; Outemu; Razer; Romer-G; Topre; Drugo
vi: Khả năng tương thích thân công tắc: Alps; Lò xo uốn; Cherry MX; Gateron quang học; Hiệu ứng Hall; Kailh BOX; Kailh Choc (thấp); Kailh Sun; Kailh X-switch; Logitech GL (thấp); Màng vòm; Outemu; Razer; Romer-G; Topre; Khác
es: Compatibilidad con vástago de interruptor: Alps; Buckling spring; Cherry MX; Gateron Optical; Efecto Hall; Kailh BOX; Kailh Choc (perfil bajo); Kailh Sun; Kailh X-switch; Logitech GL (perfil bajo); Domo de membrana; Outemu; Razer; Romer-G; Topre; Otros
nl: Compatibiliteit schakelaarssteeltje: Alps; Buckling spring; Cherry MX; Gateron Optical; Hall-effect; Kailh BOX; Kailh Choc (laag profiel); Kailh Sun; Kailh X-switch; Logitech GL (laag profiel); Membraankoepel; Outemu; Razer; Romer-G; Topre; Andere
sk-SK: Kompatibilita stopky spínača: Alps; Vzperná pružina; Cherry MX; Gateron Optical; Hallov efekt; Kailh BOX; Kailh Choc (nízky profil); Kailh Sun; Kailh X-switch; Logitech GL (nízky profil); Membránová kupola; Outemu; Razer; Romer-G; Topre; Iné
lt-LT: Jungiklio koto suderinamumas: Alps; Spyruoklinis linkstantis; Cherry MX; Gateron optinis; Hall efektas; Kailh BOX; Kailh Choc (žemo profilio); Kailh Sun; Kailh X-switch; Logitech GL (žemo profilio); Membraninė kupoliškas; Outemu; Razer; Romer-G; Topre; Kita